Alabama, session 2026rs, HB522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-22-70.01, Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§45-22-70.01
(a) Effective until the end of the term of the members
of the county commission expiring in November 2022, the county
commission of Cullman County shall be composed of three
members who shall be nominated and elected by the qualified
electors of the county at large. One member shall be elected
for each district defined herein and the member shall be a
resident and elector of the district from which the member is
elected; however, the chair of the commission shall be a
resident and elector from anywhere in the county. The powers,
duties, terms, compensation, and manner of election for the
members of the commission shall be the same as now provided by
law, except as otherwise herein provided, and the incumbent
commissioners shall continue to serve until the expiration of
their current terms at which time the successor shall qualify
as herein provided.
(b)(1)(a) Effective for the term of the Associate
Commissioners of the Cullman County Commission commencing in
November 2022, the Cullman County Commission shall be composed
Page 1

November 2022, the Cullman County Commission shall be composed
HB522 Enrolled
of a chair and four associate commissioners who shall be
nominated and elected by the qualified electors of the county
at large at-large.
(2)(b) One associate commissioner shall be elected for
each district defined herein in this subsection and each
associate commissioner shall be a resident and elector of the
district that the member represents. The districts of the
county commission shall be designated Commission District One;
Commission District Two; Commission District Three; and
Commission District Four. In order to stagger the terms of the
associate commissioners, the associate commissioner initially
elected from Commission District Three and Commission District
Four shall be elected for an initial term of two years and the
associate commissioners elected from Commission District One
and Commission District Two shall be elected for a term of
four years. Thereafter, successors shall be elected for terms
of four years. The associate county commissioners shall serve
on a part-time basis.
(3)(c) The Chair of the Cullman County Commission shall
continue to be a resident and elector from anywhere in the
county and shall serve on a full-time basis. The chair of the
county commission shall continue to serve a four-year term.
(4)(d) The powers, duties, terms, and manner of
election for the members of the county commission shall be the
same as now provided by law, except as provided otherwise in
this section. The chair of the county commission may not vote
except in the case of a tie vote of the associate
commissioners.
Page 2

commissioners.
HB522 Enrolled
(5)(e) Effective beginning in November 2020, the The
county commission shall establish and hold at least one
meeting of the commission each month after 6:00 p.m., in order
to encourage members of the working public to attend
commission meetings as required by Section 11-3-8, and shall
post and publish the days, times, and places of their
meetings. The commission, by resolution, may alter the regular
meeting days as necessary, and may schedule a special meeting
when determined necessary in writing by a majority of the
members of the commission or, in case of an emergency, at the
call of the chair."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
HB522 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 10-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk




100
101 Senate 19-Mar-26 Passed
102
103
104
Page 4